Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.110

False excavation confirmation code—Penalty.

Any person who intentionally provides an equipment operator with a false excavation confirmation code is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 263 s 17; 2005 c 448 s 7.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.